District of Columbia statutes.
7-1721.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Other tobacco product” means a cigar, pipe tobacco, chewing tobacco, smokeless tobacco, snuff, roll-your-own tobacco, cigarette papers or tubes, pipes for smoking tobacco, or any other product containing tobacco that is intended for human consumption.

(2)

“Self-service display” means a display that contains tobacco products and is located in an area openly accessible to consumers, and from which consumers can readily access cigarettes or other tobacco product without the assistance of a sales clerk. A display case that holds cigarettes or other tobacco product behind locked doors does not constitute a self-service display.

(3)

“Tobacco specialty store” means a retail store that is used primarily for the sale of cigarettes, other tobacco product, and accessories in which the total annual revenue generated by the sale of non-tobacco products or accessories is no greater than 25% of the total revenue of the establishment.

History

Feb. 7, 1891, 26 Stat. 736, ch. 117, § 2
as added July 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-189, § 3(b), 57 DCR 3019